District of Columbia statutes.
47-4805

Additional filings.

The Chief Financial Officer or the Department may require the filing of additional documentation necessary to determine the eligibility or accuracy of a tax credit claimed under the provisions of this chapter through the promulgation of regulations.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7142(b), 61 DCR 9990